California, session 20252026, AB935.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 33315.5 is added to the Education Code, to read:33315.5. (a) (1) Beginning July 1, 2026, upon receipt of a complaint that alleges unlawful discrimination, harassment, intimidation, or bullying received by the department pursuant to subparagraph (F) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 33315, the Superintendent shall collect all of the following information:(A) The self-identified protected group of the complainant, if voluntarily provided.(B) A description of the complaint received.(C) Any action taken by the department in response to the complaint and the timeline for that action.(D) The disposition of the complaint.(2) The data collected pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be confidential and protected from public disclosure, including disclosure pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code), except that the information may be disclosable pursuant to that act to the same extent as the underlying complaint.(b) (1) Beginning July 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, the department shall create and post on the department’s internet website a summary report of the information collected pursuant to subdivision (a).(2) The summary report shall not contain any personally identifying information about any individual, and the information in the report shall be sufficiently deidentified to prevent the identification of the individuals involved in the complaint. (c) The collection, publication, and transmission of data required by this section shall comply with all applicable state and federal privacy laws.SEC. 2. Section 8310.10 is added to the Government Code, to read:8310.10. (a) For purposes of this section, “department” means the Civil Rights Department.(b) (1) For a complaint received by the department, the department shall collect the following information:(A) Demographic data relative to ethnicity, race, gender, and other critical demographic information from the individual submitting the complaint collected in compliance with all applicable state and federal laws, to the extent it is reported by the complainant.(B) Any final action taken by the department in response to the complaint received and the timeline between the date the complaint was filed with the department and the final action taken by the department.(2) The information collected pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be confidential and protected from public disclosure, including disclosure pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1), except that the information may be disclosable pursuant to that act to the same extent as the underlying complaint.(c) (1) Commencing July 1, 2027, no later than October 1 of each year, the department shall create and post on the department’s internet website a summary report of the information collected for the preceding calendar year pursuant to subdivision (b).(2) The summary report shall not contain any personally identifying information about any individual, and the department may take any action to ensure that the information in the report is sufficiently deidentified to prevent the identification of the individuals involved in the complaint and that the report complies with all state and federal laws.(d) The collection, publication, and transmission of data required by this section shall comply with all applicable state and federal privacy laws.SEC. 3. The Legislature finds and declares that Sections 1 and 2 of this act, which add Section 33315.5 to the Education Code, and add Section 8310.10 to the Government Code, impose a limitation on the public’s right of access to the meetings of public bodies or the writings of public officials and agencies within the meaning of Section 3 of Article I of the California Constitution. Pursuant to that constitutional provision, the Legislature makes the following findings to demonstrate the interest protected by this limitation and the need for protecting that interest:In order to protect the privacy of California residents, while also gathering and publicizing useful demographic data, it is necessary that personal identifying information remain confidential.